Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2605
Majority action by arbitrators.

The powers of the arbitrators may be exercised by a majority unless otherwise provided by the agreement or by the Uniform Arbitration Act.

Laws 1987, LB 71, § 5.